Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2893
Pharmacy Technician
Registry; created; contents.

(1) The Pharmacy Technician
Registry is created. The department shall list each pharmacy technician registration
in the registry. A listing in the registry shall be valid for the term of
the registration and upon renewal unless such listing is refused renewal or
is removed as provided in section 38-2894.

(2) The registry shall contain the following information on
each individual who meets the conditions set out in section 38-2890: (a) The
individual's full name; (b) information necessary to identify the individual; and (c) any other information
as the department may require by rule and regulation.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 34;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,147.68;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 2.